Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1115
Funding for aging and disability resource centers.

The department shall award funding for aging and disability resource centers. The department shall pursue federal matching funds as applicable and allocate such funds to the aging and disability resource centers.

Laws 2015, LB320, § 5;

Laws 2018, LB793, § 4.
April 24, 2018